Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.200

Verified reports of milk dealers.

Each milk dealer subject to the provisions of this chapter shall from time to time, as required by rule of the director, make and file a verified report, on forms prescribed by the director, of all matters on account for which a record is required to be kept, together with such other information or facts as may be pertinent and material within the scope of the purpose of this chapter. Such reports shall cover a period specified in the order, and shall be filed within a time fixed by the director.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 20.]